Washington statutes.
RCW 13.40.310

Transitional treatment program for gang and drug-involved juvenile offenders.

(1) The department may contract with a community-based nonprofit organization to establish a three-step transitional treatment program for gang and drug-involved juvenile offenders committed to the custody of the department under this chapter. Any such program shall provide six to twenty-four months of treatment. The program shall emphasize the principles of self-determination, unity, collective work and responsibility, cooperative economics, and creativity. The program shall be culturally relevant and appropriate and shall include:

(a) A culturally relevant and appropriate institution-based program that provides comprehensive drug and alcohol services, individual and family counseling, and a wilderness experience of constructive group living, rigorous physical exercise, and academic studies;

(b) A culturally relevant and appropriate community-based structured group living program that focuses on individual goals, positive community involvement, coordinated drug and alcohol treatment, coordinated individual and family counseling, academic and vocational training, and employment in apprenticeship, internship, and entrepreneurial programs; and

(c) A culturally relevant and appropriate transitional group living program that provides support services, academic services, and coordinated individual and family counseling.

(2) Participation in any such program shall be on a voluntary basis.

(3) The department shall adopt rules as necessary to implement any such program.

[ 2017 3rd sp.s. c 6 s 614; 1991 c 326 s 4.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2017 3rd sp.s. c 6 ss 601-631, 701-728, and 804: See note following RCW 13.04.011.

Conflict with federal requirements—2017 3rd sp.s. c 6: See RCW 43.216.908.

Finding—1991 c 326: "The legislature finds that a destructive lifestyle of drug and street gang activity is rapidly becoming prevalent among some of the state's youths. Gang and drug activity may be a culturally influenced phenomenon which the legislature intends public and private agencies to consider and address in prevention and treatment programs. Gang and drug-involved youths are more likely to become addicted to drugs or alcohol, live in poverty, experience high unemployment, be incarcerated, and die of violence than other youths." [ 1991 c 326 s 3.]